Hawaii, session 2025, HB798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 342D-50.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§342D-50.5[]  Treated] Wastewater or raw sewage; prohibition.  (a)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no person, including any public body, shall discharge any [treated] wastewater or raw sewage into state waters after December 31, 2026; provided that this section shall not apply to a [sewage] treatment plant that: (1)  [Utilizes sewage to produce] Produces clean energy pursuant to section 196-10.5; [and] (2)  Is in compliance with this chapter, rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, or a permit or variance issued by the director[.]; or (3)  Has a treatment capacity of less than ten million gallons per day. (b)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to: (1)  Prohibit the use of reclaimed or recycled water for a beneficial purpose as provided by law; or (2)  Allow the discharge of [treated] wastewater or raw sewage into state waters in violation of any federal statute, rule, or regulation." SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________